Alaska statutes. Title 27. Mining.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1983 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982 and in 1983, 1998, 2008, and 2016 to make other minor changes.

Cross references. —

For provisions concerning management and use of water in mining, see AS 46.16. For leasing of mineral land, see AS

38.05.135

—

38.05.184

.
For mining rights, see AS

38.05.185

—

38.05.275

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Federal locators have rights under state mining law pursuant to AS

38.05.275

if they have complied with all federal requirements under this title.
June 10, 1982, Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

Maxfield, Houghton, and Allen, Taxation of Mining Operations (Matthew Bender).